Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-205 Definitions. As used in
this part:

"Account" means any of the three
accounts created under section 431:16-206(a).

"Association" means the Hawaii life
and disability insurance guaranty association created under section 431:16-206.

"Authorized assessment" or
"authorized" when used in the context of assessments means a
resolution by the board of directors that has been passed whereby an assessment
will be called immediately or in the future from member insurers for a specified
amount.

"Called assessment" or
"called" when used in the context of assessments means a notice that
has been issued by the association to member insurers requiring that an
authorized assessment be paid within the time frame set forth within the
notice.

"Contractual obligation" means any
obligation under a policy or contract or certificate under a group policy or
contract, or portion thereof for which coverage is provided under section
431:16-203.

"Covered policy" means any policy or
contract or portion of a policy or contract for which coverage is provided
under section 431:16-203.

"Extra-contractual claims" shall
include, but not be limited to, claims relating to bad faith in the payment of
claims, punitive or exemplary damages, or attorneys' fees and costs.

"Impaired insurer" means a member
insurer that after July 1, 1988, is not an insolvent insurer, and is
placed under an order of rehabilitation or conservation by a court of competent
jurisdiction.

"Insolvent insurer" means a member
insurer that after July 1, 1988, is placed under an order of liquidation by a
court of competent jurisdiction with a finding of insolvency.

"Member insurer" means any insurer
licensed or who holds a certificate of authority to transact in this State any
kind of insurance for which coverage is provided under section 431:16‑203,
and includes any insurer whose license or certificate of authority in this
State may have been suspended, revoked, not renewed, or voluntarily withdrawn,
but does not include:

(1) A nonprofit hospital or medical service
organization;

(2) A health maintenance organization;

(3) A fraternal benefit society;

(4) A mandatory state pooling plan;

(5) A mutual assessment company or any entity that
operates on an assessment basis;

(6) An insurance exchange;

(7) An organization that has a certificate or license
limited to the issuance of charitable gift annuities; or

(8) Any entity similar to any of the above.

"Moody's Corporate Bond Yield
Average" means the Monthly Average Corporates as published by Moody's
Investors Service, Inc., or any successor thereto.

"Owner", "policy owner", or
"contract owner" means the person who is identified as the legal
owner under the terms of the policy or contract or who is otherwise vested with
legal title to the policy or contract through a valid assignment completed in
accordance with the terms of the policy or contract and properly recorded as
the owner on the books of the insurer. The terms "owner",
"contract owner", and "policy owner" do not include persons
with a mere beneficial interest in a policy or contract.

"Person" means any individual,
corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association, governmental
body or entity, or voluntary organization.

"Premiums" means amounts and
considerations received on covered policies or contracts less premiums,
considerations and deposits returned thereon, and less dividends and experience
credits thereon. Premiums does not include any amounts or consideration
received for any policies or contracts or for the portions of any policies or
contracts for which coverage is not provided under section 431:16-203(b) except
that assessable premium shall not be reduced on accounts under section 431:16‑203(b)(2)(C)
relating to interest limitations and section 431:16-203(c)(2) relating to limitations
with respect to any one life and any one contract holder. Premiums shall also not include:

(1) Premiums on an unallocated
annuity contract; or

(2) Premiums in excess of
$5,000,000, regardless of:

(A) The number of policies or contracts held
by the owner, with respect to multiple non-group policies of life insurance
owned by one owner;

(B) Whether the policy owner is an
individual, firm, corporation, or other person; and

(C) Whether the persons insured are officers,
managers, employees, or other persons.

"Receivership court" means the court
in the insolvent or impaired insurer's state having jurisdiction over the
conservation, rehabilitation, or liquidation of the insurer.

"Resident"
means a person to whom a contractual obligation is owed and who resides in this
State on the date of entry of a court order that determines a member insurer to
be an impaired insurer or an insolvent insurer. A person may be a resident of
only one state, which in the case of a person other than a natural person shall
be its principal place of business. Citizens of the United States who are:

(1) Residents of foreign countries; or

(2) Residents of United States possessions,
territories, or protectorates that do not have an association similar to the
association created by this part,

shall be deemed residents of the state of domicile
of the insurer that issued the policies or contracts.

"State" means a state, the District
of Columbia, Puerto Rico, or a United States possession, territory, or
protectorate.

"Structured settlement annuity" means
an annuity purchased to fund periodic payments for a plaintiff or other
claimant in payment for or with respect to personal injury suffered by the
plaintiff or other claimant.

"Supplemental contract" means a
written agreement entered into for the distribution of proceeds under a life,
health, or annuity policy or life, health, or annuity contract.

"Unallocated annuity contract" means
any annuity contract or group annuity certificate that is not issued to and
owned by an individual, except to the extent of any annuity benefits guaranteed
to an individual by an insurer under such contract or certificate. [L 1987, c
347, pt of §2; am L 2004, c 122, §74; am L 2012, c 250, §5]

Note

The 2012 amendment shall not apply to proceedings in which a
member insurer is placed under an order of liquidation prior to July 1, 2012.
L 2012, c 250, §15.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next